Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF2399.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; RONDO COMMUNITY LAND TRUST.new text end new text begin $6,000,000 in fiscal year 2026 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of employment and economic development for a grant to Rondo Community Land Trust, a 501(c)(3) nonprofit organization, to acquire, design, and redevelop parcels between Dale street and Saint Albans Street in the city of St. Paul. This appropriation includes money for site improvements, infrastructure, and landscaping. This appropriation is onetime and is available until the project is completed. new text end